District of Columbia statutes.
32-1610

Use of funds for employment and training activities.

(a)

The District’s state workforce investment board shall develop policies and procedures pertaining to the use of funds pursuant to section 134 [29 U.S.C. § 2864] of the Federal Act.

(b)

Repealed.

(b-1)

The WIC shall establish policies and procedures for the development of a one- stop delivery system consistent with the requirements of sections 121 and 134(c) of the Federal Act, including policies and procedures for the certification of American Job Centers and the selection of one-stop operators consistent with the requirements of section 121(d) of the Federal Act.

(b-2)

The WIC shall develop policies and procedures to ensure that American Job Centers provide:

(1)

Core services, as described in section 134(d)(2) of the Federal Act;

(2)

Access to intensive career services, as described in section 134(d)(3) of the Federal Act; and

(3)

Training services, as described in 134(d)(4) of the Federal Act and consistent with the requirements in § 32-1607.

(c)

Intensive services offered by the one-stop delivery system may include addiction recovery. Consistent with this subchapter, intensive services may also include short-term prevocational services that raise job seekers’ basic reading, writing and computational skills to enable them to compete for jobs.

(d)

Repealed.

(d-1)

The policies and procedures required by subsection (b-2) of this section shall ensure that eligible individuals seeking services through American Job Centers receive an initial assessment of aptitudes and abilities that is non-gender biased and that assesses a woman’s interest in high-wage employment, including for positions that are nontraditional employment for women.

(e)

Consistent with this subchapter, job seekers who are employed, but do not earn a self-sufficient wage, shall be eligible for intensive services.

(f)

Any funds expended pursuant to this section shall be appropriated by the Council of the District of Columbia.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-150, § 11, 47 DCR 4644
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 129(f), 56 DCR 1117
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-263, § 2(j), 62 DCR 1518
This section is referenced in § 1-328.05.
D.C. Law 17-353, in subsecs. (a) and (f), validated previously made technical corrections.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-263 rewrote (a); repealed (b) and (d); and added (b-1), (b-2), and (d-1).